Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 15 Sales Tax

Constitutionality of provisions improperly questioned. —

The rule that points raised for first time in petition for rehearing will ordinarily not be considered is especially applicable in cases questioning constitutionality of a statute, and it was so applied where constitutionality of this article was first questioned on petition for rehearing. Walgreen Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 62 Wyo. 288, 166 P.2d 960,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1946).

Effect of 1937 provisions on 1935 provisions. —

Though the 1935 Sales Tax Act expired the day before the 1937 act for the same purpose became effective, the latter must be regarded in many respects as amendatory of the earlier law. State v. Holly Sugar Corp., 57 Wyo. 272, 116 P.2d 847,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1941).

Use tax is complementary to sales tax;

the sales of goods bought outside state and brought into state is put on equal footing with goods subject to the sales tax. Morrison-Knudson Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 58 Wyo. 500, 135 P.2d 927,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1943).

Board (now department) is duly authorized to make rules

regarding the ascertainment of the taxes due and the general administration of this article. Hercules Powder Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 66 Wyo. 309, 210 P.2d 824 (Wyo. 1949).

Retroactive change in rule unlawful. —

A rule of the board (now department) which was operative as early as 1937 declared that where personal property was purchased from a retailer without Wyoming and shipped by him directly to a customer in this state, the receipts from such a sale were not taxable under the sales tax but were subject to the use tax. Since the rule represented the board's interpretation of the statutes and had been in force for over a decade, a foreign company was entitled to rely on it in formulating business policies, and it would be unlawful and unfair for the board to establish retroactively a contrary policy. Hercules Powder Co. v. State Bd. of Equalization, 66 Wyo. 268, 208 P.2d 1096,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1949).

Taxpayer cannot escape liability for penalties due on sales taxes

on ground that it acted in good faith in questioning by court proceedings tax involved, because the statute makes no exception. State v. Holly Sugar Corp., 57 Wyo. 272, 116 P.2d 847,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1941).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Sales and Use Taxes §§ 1 to 166.

Employee's acquisition of employer's commodities at discount or without cost as within sales tax statute, 1 ALR2d 1020.

Sales tax on parts, repairs, or constituents used in repair of articles, 11 ALR2d 926.

Application of sales tax to one operating dining room, cafeteria, or beverage room incidental to other business, 13 ALR2d 1362.

Validity of sales tax as applied to judicial or bankruptcy sales, 27 ALR2d 1219.

Applicability of sales tax to “tips” or service charges added in lieu of tips, 73 ALR3d 1226.

Sales and use taxes on sale or lease of mailing or customer list, 80 ALR4th 1126.

47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue §§ 586 to 607.